Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-475
School district merged into Class I, II, III, or IV school district; effective; when.

Whenever an existing school district, or a part thereof, is merged into a Class I, II, III, or IV school district under the provisions of section 79-407, 79-408, or 79-473, such merger shall be effective on July 1 immediately following the effective date of the change of city or village boundaries which caused the merger pursuant to section 79-407, 79-408, or 79-473.

Laws 1965, c. 509, § 2, p. 1628;

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-801.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 224;

Laws 2005, LB 198, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 32.
July 19, 2024
This section is limited to provisions of former section 79-801, and is not applicable to school district boundary changes under other statutes. Corcoran v. Boone County Board of Equalization, 196 Neb. 363, 243 N.W.2d 60 (1976).

An action to enjoin a school district or part thereof, consequent upon annexation of territory by a city of the first class, is barred by the statute of limitations unless brought within one year from effective date of annexation ordinance. School Dist. No. 127 of Lincoln County v. Simpson, 191 Neb. 164, 214 N.W.2d 251 (1974).

Merger takes place on the date specified in this section. School Dist. of Bellevue v. Strawn, 185 Neb. 392, 176 N.W.2d 42 (1970).